District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.51

Organization meeting of directors.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 199, ch. 269, § 51
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(p), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.51.
1981 Ed., § 29-351.
1973 Ed., § 29-921e.